apertium-ga-gv.ga.dix
    <pardef n="deigh/il__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfar</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfaidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfaimid</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfaidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfaidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfaidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfaidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfaí</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfainn</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfaimis</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfá</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfadh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfadh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealfaidís</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lim</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>limis</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ligí</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leadh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lidís</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leadh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leamar</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leadar</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealtaí</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>linn</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>limis</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealtá</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leadh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leadh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lidís</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilte</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilte</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilte</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilte</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealtar</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lim</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>limid</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leann</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leann</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leann</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leann</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>limid</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ear__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ire</l>
          <r>ear<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eara</l>
          <r>ear<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="deighil"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eigh</i><par n="deigh/il__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mear"><par n="initial-m"/><i></i><par n="m/ear__adj"/></e>
